District of Columbia statutes.
36-304.11

Definitions.

Expired.

Apr. 19, 1977, D.C. Law 1-123, § 5A-301
as added July 18, 2005, D.C. Law 18-35, § 2(b), 56 DCR 4282

This subchapter expired on January 1, 2011, pursuant to section 3 of D.C. Law 18-35.

Section 3 of D.C. Law 18-35 provided: “Section 2(b) enacting this subchapter shall expire on January 1, 2011.”